Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-258
Ditches; maintenance; outlets; headgates; duties of owner.

Any owner or person in control of any ditch for irrigation purposes shall have the ditch in order to receive water from the source of supply on or before April 15 of each year, shall construct necessary outlets in the banks for the delivery of water to all persons who are entitled to the same, and shall maintain a substantial headgate and measuring box or weir at the head of each lateral, which shall be constructed in accordance with plans and specifications approved by the Chief Water Officer. A multiplicity of outlets shall be avoided. The outlet shall be at the most convenient and practicable point consistent with the protection and safety of the ditch and the efficient distribution of water among the various claimants thereof.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. V, div. 3, § 12, p. 850;

C.S.1922, § 8462;

C.S.1929, § 46-612;

R.S.1943, § 46-258;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 122;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 103.

This section does not affect the duty of irrigation district to furnish water, but only prescribes upon whom duty to construct outlets rests. State ex rel. Clarke v. Gering Irr. Dist., 109 Neb. 642, 192 N.W. 212 (1923).